Washington statutes.
RCW 36.92.080

Services limited to department.

When a board of county commissioners creates a central services department pursuant to RCW 36.92.030, the ministerial services to be performed by such department in connection with automatic data processing shall not thereafter be performed by any other officer or employee of said county.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 103 s 9.]